Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.250

State of emergency—Refusing to leave public way or property when ordered—Penalty.

Any person upon any public way or any public property, within the area described in the state of emergency, who is directed by a public official to leave the public way or public property and refuses to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 6.]